Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-704
Consolidation of actions; order.

The order for consolidation may be made by the court or by a judge thereof in vacation.

R.S.1867, Code § 151, p. 417;

R.S.1913, § 7660;

C.S.1922, § 8604;

C.S.1929, § 20-704;

R.S.1943, § 25-704.

An order of consolidation that was not expressly limited to a particular purpose merged the cases into one action for all purposes, becoming a single action in which a single judgment is rendered. Mathiesen v. Kellogg, 315 Neb. 840, 1 N.W.3d 888 (2024).